Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 4 GENERAL REGULATIONS
30-15-401. General regulations - definitions.

In addition to those powers granted by sections

30-11-101

and

30-11-107

and by parts 1, 2, and 3 of this article 15, the board of county commissioners may adopt ordinances for control or licensing of those matters of purely local concern that are described in the following enumerated powers:

To provide for and compel the removal of rubbish, including trash, junk, and garbage, from lots and tracts of land within the county, except industrial tracts of ten or more acres and agricultural land currently in agricultural use as the term agricultural land is defined in section

39-1-102

(1.6), C.R.S., and from the alleys behind and from the sidewalk areas in front of such property at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance, including removal performed by the county upon notice to and failure of the property owner to remove such rubbish, and to assess the reasonable cost thereof, including five percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the lots and tracts from which such rubbish has been removed. Ordinances passed by a board of county commissioners for the removal of rubbish pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall include provisions for applying for and exercising an administrative entry and seizure warrant issued by a county or district court having jurisdiction over the property from which rubbish shall be removed. Any assessment pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall be a lien against such lot or tract of land until paid and shall have priority over all other liens except general taxes and prior special assessments. In case such assessment is not paid within a reasonable time specified by ordinance, it may be certified by the clerk to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of assessments pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A).
(a) (I) (A) To provide for and compel the removal of rubbish, including trash, junk, and garbage, from lots and tracts of land within the county, except industrial tracts of ten or more acres and agricultural land currently in agricultural use as the term agricultural land is defined in section

39-1-102

(1.6), C.R.S., and from the alleys behind and from the sidewalk areas in front of such property at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance, including removal performed by the county upon notice to and failure of the property owner to remove such rubbish, and to assess the reasonable cost thereof, including five percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the lots and tracts from which such rubbish has been removed. Ordinances passed by a board of county commissioners for the removal of rubbish pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall include provisions for applying for and exercising an administrative entry and seizure warrant issued by a county or district court having jurisdiction over the property from which rubbish shall be removed. Any assessment pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall be a lien against such lot or tract of land until paid and shall have priority over all other liens except general taxes and prior special assessments. In case such assessment is not paid within a reasonable time specified by ordinance, it may be certified by the clerk to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of assessments pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A).

A county court or district court having jurisdiction over property from which rubbish shall be removed pursuant to the ordinances authorized by sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) shall issue an administrative entry and seizure warrant for the removal of such rubbish. Such warrant shall be issued upon presentation by a county of ordinance provisions which meet the requirements of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) and a sworn or affirmed affidavit stating the factual basis for such warrant, evidence that the property owner has received notice of the violation and has failed to remove the rubbish within a reasonable prescribed period of time, a general description of the location of the property which is the subject of the warrant, a general list of any rubbish to be removed from such property, and the proposed disposal or temporary impoundment of such rubbish, whichever the court deems appropriate. Within ten days following the date of issuance of an administrative entry and seizure warrant pursuant to the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (B), such warrant shall be executed in accordance with directions by the issuing court, a copy of such issued warrant shall be provided or mailed to the property owner, and proof of the execution of such warrant, including a written inventory of any property impounded by the executing authority, shall be submitted to the court by the executing authority.

(I.5) (A) To provide for and compel the removal of weeds and brush from lots and tracts of land within the county except agricultural land currently in agricultural use as the term agricultural land is defined in section 39-1-102 (1.6), C.R.S., and from the alleys behind and from the sidewalk areas in front of such property at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance, including removal performed by the county upon notice to and failure of the property owner to remove such weeds and brush, and to assess the reasonable cost thereof, including ten percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the property from which such weeds have been removed. Ordinances passed by a board of county commissioners for the removal of weeds and brush pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall include provisions for applying for and exercising an administrative entry and seizure warrant issued by a county or district court having jurisdiction over the property from which weeds and brush shall be removed. Any assessment pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) shall be a lien against such property until paid and shall have priority based on its date of recording. A county shall not compel the removal of weeds and brush pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (A) upon any lot or tract of land within the county during such time that a mortgage or deed of trust secured by the lot or tract of land is being foreclosed upon.

(B) In case such assessment is not paid within a reasonable time specified by ordinance, it may be certified by the clerk to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of such assessments pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B).

A county court or district court having jurisdiction over property from which weeds and brush shall be removed pursuant to the ordinances authorized by sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I.5) shall issue an administrative entry and seizure warrant for the removal of such weeds and brush. Such warrant shall be issued upon presentation by a county of ordinance provisions which meet the requirements of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I.5) and a sworn or affirmed affidavit stating the factual basis for such warrant, evidence that the property owner has received notice of the violation and has failed to remove the weeds and brush within a reasonable prescribed period of time, a general description of the location of the property which is the subject of the warrant, and the proposed disposal of such weeds and brush. Within ten days following the date of issuance of an administrative entry and seizure warrant pursuant to the provisions of this sub-subparagraph (C), such warrant shall be executed in accordance with directions by the issuing court, a copy of such issued warrant shall be provided or mailed to the property owner, and proof of the execution of such warrant shall be submitted to the court by the executing authority.

To inspect vehicles proposed to be operated in the conduct of the business of transporting ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials and to determine, among other things, that any such vehicle has the following:

A permanent cover of canvas or equally suitable or superior material designed to cover the entire open area of the body of such vehicle;

A body so constructed as to be permanently leakproof as to such discarded materials;

Extensions of sideboards and tailgate, if any, constructed of permanent materials;

To contract with persons in the business of transporting and disposing of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials to provide such services, but in no event on an exclusive territorial basis, to every lot and tract of land requiring such services within the unincorporated area of the county or in conjunction with the county on such terms as shall be agreed to by the board of county commissioners. Nothing in this subparagraph (III) shall be deemed to preclude the owner or tenant of any such lot or tract from removing discarded materials from his lot, so long as appropriate standards of safety and health are observed.

To regulate the activities of persons in the business of transporting ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials within the unincorporated area by requiring each such person to secure a license from the county and charging a fee therefor to cover the cost of administration and enforcement and by requiring adherence to such reasonable standards of health and safety as may be prescribed by the board of county commissioners and to prohibit any person from commercially collecting or disposing of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials within the unincorporated area without a license and when not in compliance with such standards of health and safety as may be prescribed by the board;

To do all acts and make all regulations which may be necessary or expedient for the promotion of health or the suppression of disease, limited to the following:

In addition to the authority given counties under section

18-4-511

, C.R.S., to restrain, fine, and punish persons for dumping rubbish, including trash, junk, and garbage, on public or private property;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 2054, § 11, effective July 1, 2008.)

To adopt reasonable regulations for controlling pollution caused by wood smoke;

In addition to the authority given counties under article 5 of title 35, C.R.S., to establish mosquito control areas, to assess the whole cost thereof against those persons especially benefitted by the service, and, if a person's portion of the assessment is not paid within a reasonable time as specified by ordinance, to direct that the assessment, which shall be a lien against the property of such person, be certified by the county clerk and recorder to the county treasurer for collection in the same manner as other taxes are collected;

To require every person in the business of transporting ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials to and from disposal sites to have, before commencing such operations, in such motor vehicle a motor vehicle liability insurance policy or evidence of such policy issued by an insurance carrier or insurer authorized to do business in the state of Colorado in the sum of not less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars for damages for or on account of any bodily injury to or the death of each person as the result of any one accident, in the sum of not less than one hundred fifty thousand dollars for damages to the property of others as the result of any one accident, and in the total sum of not less than four hundred thousand dollars for damages for or on account of any bodily injury to or the death of all persons and for damages to the property of others. Any liability for failure to comply with the requirements of this subparagraph (VI) shall be borne by the individual, partnership, or corporation who owns such vehicle.

To prevent and suppress riots, routs, affrays, disturbances, and disorderly assemblies in any public or private place;

To suppress bawdy and disorderly houses and houses of ill fame or assignation; to suppress gaming and gambling houses, lotteries, and fraudulent devices and practices for the purpose of gaining or obtaining money or property; and to regulate the promotion or wholesale promotion of obscene material and obscene performances, as defined in part 1 of article 7 of title 18, C.R.S.;

To restrain and punish loiterers and prostitutes;

To discourage juvenile delinquency through the imposition of curfews applicable to juveniles, the restraint and punishment of loitering by juveniles, and the restraint and punishment of defacement of, including the affixing of graffiti to, buildings and other public or private property by juveniles by means that may include restrictions on the purchase or possession of graffiti implements by juveniles. The board of county commissioners, when enacting an ordinance to carry out the powers granted by this subsection (1)(d.5), may make it unlawful for a retailer to sell graffiti implements to juveniles but shall not dictate the manner in which the retailer displays graffiti implements. For purposes of this subsection (1)(d.5), "juvenile" means a juvenile as defined in section

19-2.5-102

and "graffiti implement" means an aerosol paint container, broad-tipped marker, gum label, paint stick or graffiti stick, or etching equipment.

To control unleashed or unclaimed animals, except those animals defined in section

35-44-101 (1)

, C.R.S.;

To use the county jail for the confinement or punishment of offenders, subject to such conditions as are imposed by law and with the consent of the board of county commissioners;

To authorize the acceptance of a bail bond when any person has been arrested for the violation of any ordinance and a continuance or postponement of trial is granted. When such bond is accepted, it shall have the same validity and effect as bail bonds provided for under the criminal statutes of this state.

To control and regulate the movement and parking of vehicles and motor vehicles on public property; except that misdemeanor traffic offenses and the posted speed limit on any state highway located within the county shall be deemed a matter of statewide interest. The county may establish fire lanes and emergency vehicle access on public or private property zoned commercial or residential and provide for fines and punishment of violators.

To regulate and license escort bureaus, escorts, and escort bureau runners to the extent permitted under article 11.8 of title 29;

To regulate and license secondhand dealers to the extent permitted under article 13 of title 18, C.R.S.;

To regulate and license pawnbrokers as provided in section

29-11.9-102

;

To require registration of persons who engage in door-to-door selling of merchandise or goods and the delivery thereof within the county; except that nonprofit organizations which are exempt from the income tax imposed under article 22 of title 39, C.R.S., and schools shall not be subject to county requirements imposed under this paragraph (k.5);

To adopt reasonable regulations for the operation of establishments open to the public in which persons appear in a state of nudity for the purpose of entertaining the patrons of such establishment; except that such regulations shall not be tantamount to a complete prohibition of such operation. Such regulations may include the following:

Minimum age requirements for admittance to such establishments;

Limitations on the hours during which such establishments may be open for business; and

Restrictions on the location of such establishments with regard to schools, churches, and residential areas.

The board of county commissioners may enact ordinances which provide that any establishment which engages in repeated or continuing violations of regulations adopted by the board shall constitute a public nuisance. The county attorney of such county, or the district attorney acting pursuant to section

16-13-302

, C.R.S., may bring an action in the district court of such county for an injunction against the operation of such establishment in a manner which violates such regulations.

Nothing in the regulations adopted by the board of county commissioners pursuant to this paragraph (l) shall be construed to apply to the presentation, showing, or performance of any play, drama, ballet, or motion picture in any theater, concert hall, museum of fine arts, school, institution of higher education, or other similar establishment as a form of expression of opinion or communication of ideas or information, as differentiated from the promotion or exploitation of nudity for the purpose of advancing the economic welfare of a commercial or business enterprise.

In addition to the authority given counties in article 12 of title 25, C.R.S., to enact ordinances which regulate noise on public and private property except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (m); prohibit the operation of any vehicle that is not equipped with a muffler in constant operation and is not properly maintained to prevent an increase in the noise emitted by the vehicle above the noise emitted when the muffler was originally installed; and prohibit the operation of any vehicle having a muffler that has been equipped or modified with a cutoff and bypass or any similar device or modification. For the purposes of this paragraph (m), "vehicle" shall have the same meaning as that set forth in section

42-1-102

(112), C.R.S.

Ordinances enacted to regulate noise on public and private property pursuant to subsection (1)(m)(I) of this section do not apply to:

Property used for purposes which are exempt, pursuant to section

25-12-103

, C.R.S., from noise abatement; and

Property used for: Manufacturing, industrial, or commercial business purposes; and public utilities regulated pursuant to title 40.

To provide for and compel the removal of snow on sidewalks within the county, at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance, including removal performed by the county upon notice to and failure of the property owner to remove such snow and to assess the whole cost thereof, and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the property from which such snow has been removed;

To ban open fires to a degree and in a manner that the board of county commissioners deems necessary to reduce the danger of wildfires within those portions of the unincorporated areas of the county where the danger of forest or grass fires is found to be high based on competent evidence.

Subject to subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (n.5), the board of county commissioners in each county that has a substantial forested area shall, by January 1, 2012, develop an open burning permit system for the purpose of safely disposing of slash. In developing an open burning permit system, the board is encouraged to consult with the division of fire prevention and control, established in section

24-33.5-1201

, C.R.S., and shall:

Collaborate with county and local jurisdictions such as the sheriff's office and fire protection districts, identify the agencies responsible for burner education, permitting, and compliance, and consider developing an education plan to inform private property owners of the benefits, criteria, and required processes for slash pile burning;

Consider and be consistent with existing laws and processes that ban, regulate, or have developed recommendations concerning open burning, including sections

18-13-109

,

18-13-109

.5,

23-31-312

,

23-31-313 (6)(a)

(II) and (6)(a)(III),

25-7-106 (7)

and (8),

25-7-123

,

29-20-105.5

, and

30-11-124

, C.R.S.;

Consider existing county ordinances;

Consider existing scientific and applied knowledge of safe burning conditions, including consideration of, and the advisability of specifying permit limitations concerning, the number of slash piles that may be burned at one time per person who is monitoring the burn, the size of slash piles, temperature, humidity, snow cover, wind conditions, overhead and other types of electric utility facilities, including adequate distances from such facilities, fuel type and moisture content, slope, and setbacks from real estate improvements;

Exempt broadcast burns conducted within federal and state guidelines that have a written prescribed fire plan and agricultural burns; and

Include mechanisms to notify individuals with respiratory conditions, if requested by the individual, and contiguous landowners of the date, time, and location of slash pile burns.

Nothing in this paragraph (n.5) infringes upon or otherwise affects the ability of agricultural producers to conduct burning on their property.

A board of county commissioners that has an open burning permit system on April 13, 2011, need not comply with the requirements of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (n.5) until the board materially alters the system.

For purposes of this subsection (1)(n.5):

"Competent evidence" includes the use of the national fire danger rating system, predictions of future fire danger such as those issued by the national interagency coordination center or any successor entity, localized evidence of low fuel moisture content, and any other similar indices or information.

"County that has a substantial forested area" means a county that has at least forty-four percent forest cover as determined by the state forester appointed pursuant to section

23-31-207

, C.R.S.

"Open burning" means fire that a person starts and that is intentionally used for forest management.

"Slash" means woody material less than six inches in diameter consisting of limbs, branches, and stems that are free of dirt. "Slash" does not include tree stumps, roots, or any other material.

To prohibit or restrict the sale, use, and possession of fireworks, including permissible fireworks, as defined in section

24-33.5-2001 (5)

and (11), for a period no longer than one year within all or any part of the unincorporated areas of the county. Such an ordinance shall be in effect for the period between May 31 and July 5 of any year only if the county adopts a resolution specifying that the ordinance remains in effect for such period, which resolution includes an express finding of high fire danger, based on competent evidence, as defined in subsection (1)(n.5) of this section. However, if the county adopts a resolution specifying that the ordinance remains in effect for such period, or any portion of such period, and subsequent to the adoption of the resolution, a change in the weather occurs resulting in competent evidence that the high fire danger is not present and no longer will be present during the remainder of the period, the county shall endeavor to promptly consider whether to exercise its legislative discretion to rescind the restrictions it has adopted on the sale, use, and possession of fireworks. Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (1)(n.7), the ordinance remains in effect and is fully enforceable until the restrictions have been rescinded.

In addition to the authority given counties under sections

30-10-513.5

and

30-15-401.5

, to enact ordinances to restrain and punish any person who gives, makes, or causes to be given a false alarm of fire and to assess costs associated with such false alarms;

To provide by ordinance for the regulation and licensing of alarm systems which transmit information to law enforcement or other public safety officials located within the county;

In addition to the authority given counties under article 7 of title 29, C.R.S., and part 7 of article 20 of this title, to establish by ordinance and regulation the fees for certificates, permits, licenses, and passes for users in order to provide the funds for recreational facility development and to offset the costs of emergency search and rescue operations on public lands and the construction, operation, and maintenance of recreation paths on public property; except that areas, lakes, properties, and facilities under the control and management of the division of parks and wildlife shall be exempt from any such fees for certificates, permits, licenses, passes, or any other special charges;

To provide for and compel the removal of any building or structure, except for a building or structure on affected land subject to the "Colorado Mined Land Reclamation Act", as the term "affected land" is defined in section

34-32-103

(1.5), C.R.S., or on lands subject to the "Colorado Surface Coal Mining Reclamation Act", pursuant to article 33 of title 34, C.R.S., the condition of which presents a substantial danger or hazard to public health, safety, or welfare, or any dilapidated building of whatever kind which is unused by the owner, or uninhabited because of deterioration or decay, which condition constitutes a fire hazard, or subjects adjoining property to danger of damage by storm, soil erosion, or rodent infestation, or which becomes a place frequented by trespassers and transients seeking a temporary hideout or shelter, at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as the board of county commissioners may prescribe by ordinance, including the removal performed by the county upon notice to and failure of the property owner to remove such building or structure, and to assess the whole cost of such removal, including incidental costs and a reasonable fee for inspection which fee shall not exceed five percent of the total amount due in connection therewith, upon the property from which such building or structure has been removed. Any assessment pursuant to this paragraph (q) shall be a lien against such property until paid. If such assessment is not paid within a reasonable time as specified by ordinance, it may be certified by the clerk and recorder to the county treasurer, who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for the cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected.

To regulate distressed real property by requiring that such real property be secured, maintained, and insured by the owner of such real property or, if applicable, by a holder of a lien that has taken possession of such real property pursuant to part 6 of article 38 of title 38, C.R.S., or any receiver appointed to take possession of or to preserve the real property. The county may require that real property owners, a holder in possession pursuant to part 6 of article 38 of title 38, C.R.S., or any receiver appointed to preserve or take possession of real property provide to the county planning and zoning department contact information for the person or entity responsible for the preservation of the real property.

For purposes of this paragraph (r), "distressed real property" means any real property in foreclosure or any vacant or abandoned real property.

To license and regulate an owner or owner's agent who rents or advertises the owner's lodging unit for a short-term stay, and to fix the fees, terms, and manner for issuing and revoking licenses issued therefor. As used in this subsection (1)(s)(I), "owner's agent" does not include an internet hospitality service.

The licensing or regulation under the authority conferred in subsection (1)(s)(I) of this section does not affect whether a lodging unit is a residential improvement, as defined in section 39-1-102 (14.3).

To require registration of businesses in the unincorporated portions of the county; except that such power does not include the power to license, collect a fee, or collect fines for such registrations. The county shall only publish registration information in a manner such that the business type is aggregated and does not allow for segregation of individuals or business who supplied the information.

(1.5) In addition to any other powers, the board of county commissioners has the power to adopt a resolution or an ordinance to:

Regulate the possession or sale of cigarettes, tobacco products, or nicotine products, as defined by section

18-13-121 (5)

, to a minor consistent with section

18-13-121 (3)

;

Limit smoking, as defined in section

25-14-203

(16), in any manner that is no less restrictive than the limitations set forth in the "Colorado Clean Indoor Air Act", part 2 of article 14 of title 25; and

License or otherwise regulate the sale of cigarettes, tobacco products, or nicotine products.

(1.7) In addition to any other powers, a board of county commissioners may charge a fee for a local license and adopt resolutions or ordinances to establish requirements on businesses engaged in the storage, extraction, processing, or manufacturing of industrial hemp, as defined in section

35-61-101 (7)

, or industrial hemp products, as defined in section

25-5-426 (2)

(g.5). A county shall not impose additional food production regulations on industrial hemp processors or products if the regulations conflict with state law.

Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the ordinances described in subsection (1) of this section shall apply throughout the unincorporated area of the county including public and state lands and to any incorporated town or city that elects by ordinance or resolution to have the provisions thereof apply.
(2) (a) (I) Except as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), the ordinances described in subsection (1) of this section shall apply throughout the unincorporated area of the county including public and state lands and to any incorporated town or city that elects by ordinance or resolution to have the provisions thereof apply.

The board of county commissioners may designate, by resolution, areas in the unincorporated territory of the county exclusively within which an ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall apply. The board shall set forth a rational basis for the designation and hold a public hearing prior to making the designation at which any interested person shall have an opportunity to be heard.

Any regulation imposed prior to January 1, 1980, by resolution adopted under any provision of law may, upon suitable accommodation to the pertinent ordinance adoption procedure set forth in this part 4, be reimposed by ordinance. In such cases the resolution shall continue in force and effect until the ordinance which replaces it becomes effective.

Nothing in this part 4 shall be construed to affect any proceeding arising under or pursuant to the provisions of law in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1980.

Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the transportation of sludge and fly ash or to the transportation of hazardous materials, as defined in the rules and regulations adopted by the chief of the Colorado state patrol pursuant to section 42-20-104 (1), C.R.S.

Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to the transporting of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials which are collected by a city, county, city and county, town, or other local subdivision within its jurisdictional limits, provided every vehicle so engaged in transporting the discarded materials has conformed to vehicle standards at least as strict as those prescribed in subparagraph (II) of paragraph (a) of subsection (1). Such governing body shall not grant an exclusive territory or regulate rates for the collection and transportation of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials.

Any provision of paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, the governing body of a city and county shall not be precluded from adopting ordinances, regulations, codes, or standards or granting permits issued pursuant to home rule authority; except that such governing body shall not grant an exclusive territory or regulate rates for the collection and transportation of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials.

If the board of county commissioners or the governing body of any other local governmental entity is providing waste services, including the collection and transportation of ashes, trash, waste, rubbish, garbage, or industrial waste products or any other discarded materials, within the limits of any county or other local subdivision on or after April 19, 1994, any private person seeking also to offer those services shall first give a one-year public notice advising of the intent to offer the services. If a private person or persons are providing waste services within the limits of any county or other local subdivision on or after April 19, 1994, any board of county commissioners or the governing body of any other local governmental entity seeking also to offer those services shall first give a one-year public notice advising of the intent to offer the services. The public notice shall be given in a local newspaper of general circulation in the area served by the waste service provider. The requirements of this subsection (6) shall not apply to any municipality or city and county subject to subsection (7.5) of this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, nothing in this section shall prohibit the providing of waste services by a private person, if that person is in compliance with applicable rules and regulations, within the limits of any municipality, city and county, or special district operating pursuant to article 1 of title 32, if those services also are provided by a governmental body within the limits of that governmental unit. The governmental body may not compel industrial or commercial establishments or multifamily residences of eight or more units to use or pay user charges for waste services provided by the governmental body in preference to those services provided by a private person.

Subject to the limitation set forth in subsection (6) of this section and notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) and subsection (7.5) of this section or any other provision of law, nothing in this section shall prohibit the providing of waste services by a private person within the limits of any county or other local subdivision if that person is in compliance with applicable rules and regulations. If services also are provided by a governmental body within the limits of the county or other local subdivision, the governmental body shall not compel any resident, including, but not limited to, an owner or tenant of industrial or commercial establishments or multifamily residences, to use or pay user charges for waste services provided by the governmental body in preference to those services provided by a private person.

(7.5) (a) Any requirement that municipal residents use or pay user charges for residential waste services pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section may be affected by utilization of the initiative and referendum power reserved to the municipal electors in section 1 (9) of article V of the Colorado constitution.

The governing body of any municipality or city and county that chooses, after April 19, 1994, to require use of or to commence the imposition of a fee for residential waste services pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section in all or any portion of the jurisdiction, including any portion of the jurisdiction annexed after April 19, 1994, may do so subject to the following requirements:

The governing body shall provide written notice to any private person who lawfully provides waste services within the jurisdiction and shall give a six-month public notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction prior to requiring the use or initial imposition of the fee. The notice shall include:

The date upon which, and the area within the jurisdiction where, requiring use of or billing for residential waste services will commence; and

An explanation of the option to request an opportunity to submit a proposal to provide residential waste services to that area.

Any person may, within thirty days following publication or receipt of the notice, request in writing the opportunity to submit a proposal to provide residential waste services within the portion of the jurisdiction where required use of those services or imposition of the fee will commence. A request for an opportunity to submit a proposal shall suspend required use of the services or imposition of the residential waste services fee until a request for proposal process, as set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (7.5), is completed. Any person who has requested in writing an opportunity to submit a proposal to provide residential waste services pursuant to this subparagraph (II) is eligible to participate in the proposal process. If no written request is received within the time permitted, the governing body may proceed to require use of or impose a fee for residential waste services without conducting a request for proposal process as set forth in paragraph (c) of this subsection (7.5).

Any municipality or city and county that complies with paragraph (c) of this subsection (7.5) shall not be subject to the provisions of section 31-12-119, C.R.S.

The requirements set forth in this subsection (7.5) shall not apply to any municipality or city and county that is legally requiring use of or imposing a fee for residential waste services within its jurisdiction pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection (7) of this section on April 19, 1994, and, having complied with the notice requirements of subsection (6) of this section applicable at the time of the initiation of such residential waste services, chooses to extend the requirement for use of or imposition of the fee for residential waste services to areas within the jurisdiction that have not been annexed after April 19, 1994.

The governing body shall conduct any request for a proposal process required pursuant to this subsection (7.5) as follows:

The governing body shall mail a request for proposals to all private persons who are eligible to submit a proposal. The request for proposals shall include a description of the portion of the jurisdiction to which residential waste services will be provided and shall request a proposed price of providing those services.

When the jurisdiction issuing the request for proposals chooses to submit a proposal, a certification of an independent auditor stating that the public entity's proposed price is not based on subsidization from entity revenue streams or operations unrelated to the provision of waste services shall be appended to the proposal.
